Maryland, session 2025, SB0807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1602.
(a) The Department shall develop building energy performance standards for
covered buildings that achieve:
(1) A 20% reduction in net direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before
January 1, 2030, as compared with 2025 levels for average buildings of similar construction;
and
(2) Net–zero direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before January 1, 2040.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0807*

SENATE BILL 807
(b) To facilitate the development of building energy performance standards under
this section, the Department shall require the owners of covered buildings to measure and
report direct emissions data to the Department annually beginning in 2025.
(c) (1) On or before June 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(2) Regulations adopted under this section shall:
(i) Subject to items (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph, include energy
use intensity targets by building type;
(ii) As necessary, include special provisions or exceptions to account
for:
1. Building age;
2. Regional differences;
3. The unique needs of particular building or occupancy
types, including health care facilities, laboratories, assisted living and nursing facilities,
military buildings, critical infrastructure, and buildings used in life sciences as defined in
§ 3–201 of the Economic Development Article; and
4. The use of district energy systems and biofuels by covered
buildings;
(iii) Consider the needs of the owners of covered buildings who:
1. Are not responsible for the design, modification, fixtures,
or equipment of commercial tenants;
2. Do not have access to or control over building energy
systems that are used or controlled by commercial tenants; or
3. Own buildings occupied by commercial tenants who are
responsible for all maintenance of and repairs to the buildings;
(iv) Provide maximum flexibility to the owners of covered buildings
to comply with building energy performance standards;
(v) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, include an alternative
compliance pathway allowing the owner of a covered building to pay a fee for greenhouse
gas emissions attributable to the building’s failure to meet direct greenhouse gas emissions
reduction targets; and

SENATE BILL 807 3
(vi) To the extent authorized by law, include financial incentives
recommended by the Building Energy Transition Implementation Task Force.
(3) The Department may not set an alternative compliance fee that is less
than the social cost of greenhouse gases adopted by the Department or the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency.
(d) Electric companies and gas companies shall provide energy data, including
whole–building and aggregate data, to the owners of covered buildings for benchmarking
purposes.
(e) In calculating the statewide standards developed by the Department under
this section, an owner of a covered building may not consider greenhouse gas emissions or
energy use by a commercial tenant of the covered building that:
(1) Is a food service facility as defined in COMAR 10.15.03.02; and
(2) Engages in commercial cooking and water heating.
(F) (1) A COUNTY MAY DEVELOP AND ADOPT LOCAL BUILDING ENERGY
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS THAT ARE AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE STANDARDS
DEVELOPED AND ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE
LOCAL BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS ARE APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPROVE LOCAL BUILDING ENERGY
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IF THE
STANDARDS ARE:
(I) INCLUSIVE OF OR MORE STRINGENT THAN THE STANDARDS
DEVELOPED AND ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(II) DESIGNED TO ACHIEVE, BY 2040 AND THROUGH
IMPROVEMENTS TO COVERED BUILDINGS IN THE AGGREGATE, GREATER ENERGY
AND GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION BENEFITS THAN THE STANDARDS DEVELOPED
AND ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) A COUNTY ADMINISTERING LOCAL BUILDING ENERGY
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY TAKE APPROPRIATE ACTIONS TO ENFORCE THE STANDARDS,
INCLUDING:
(I) ESTABLISHING ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE PATHWAYS FOR
COMPLYING WITH ENERGY USE INTENSITY AND DIRECT GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED IN THE STANDARDS; AND

SENATE BILL 807
(II) IMPOSING AND COLLECTING ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE
FEES AND PENALTIES IN THE SAME AMOUNT AND MANNER ALLOWED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(4) A COUNTY ADMINISTERING LOCAL BUILDING ENERGY
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT ANY EMISSIONS DATA REPORTED
TO THE COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STANDARDS.
(5) A COVERED BUILDING THAT IS SUBJECT TO LOCAL BUILDING
ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS ADOPTED BY A COUNTY UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IS NOT REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH STATEWIDE BUILDING ENERGY
PERFORMANCE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.